hyph_eo_XX.dic
UTF-8
1a2ĉ1aj.
1a2ĉ1ajn.
1a2ĉ1oj.
1a2ĉ1ojn.
1a2ĉ1on.
1a2ĉ3an.
1a2ĉa.
1a2ĉe.
1a2ĉo.
1a2d1aj.
1a2d1ajn.
1a2d1as.
1a2d1is.
1a2d1oj.
1a2d1ojn.
1a2d1on.
1a2d1re2s1
1a2d1us.
1a2d3an.
1a2d3os.
1a2da.
1a2de.
1a2di.
1a2dmin
1a2do.
1a2du.
1a2er
1a2f3rik
1a2fabl
1a2fiŝ
1a2gra
1a2ĵ1aj.
1a2ĵ1ajn.
1a2ĵ1oj.
1a2ĵ1ojn.
1a2ĵ1on.
1a2ĵ3an.
1a2ĵa.
1a2ĵe.
1a2ĵo.
1a2kir1
1a2kr
1a2kv
1a2merik
1a2per
1a2r1aj.
1a2r1ajn.
1a2r1oj.
1a2r1ojn.
1a2r1on.
1a2r2b
1a2r3an.
1a2ra.
1a2re.
1a2rig
1a2riĝ
1a2ro.
1a2t1aj.
1a2t1ajn.
1a2t1ec
1a2t1oj.
1a2t1ojn.
1a2t1on.
1a2t3an.
1a2ta.
1a2te.
1a2to.
1a2va1r
1an1t1aj.
1an1t1ajn.
1an1t1oj.
1an1t1ojn.
1an1t1on.
1an1t3an.
1an1ta.
1an1te.
1an1to.
1an2t1ec
1an2t1i2n1aj.
1an2t1i2n1ajn.
1an2t1i2n1oj.
1an2t1i2n1ojn.
1an2t1i2n1on.
1an2t1i2n3an.
1an2t1i2na.
1an2t1i2ne.
1an2t1i2no.
1an2t1ig
1as.
1e2ben
1e2bl1aj.
1e2bl1ajn.
1e2bl1aĵ
1e2bl1as.
1e2bl1ec
1e2bl1is.
1e2bl1oj.
1e2bl1ojn.
1e2bl1on.
1e2bl1us.
1e2bl3an.
1e2bl3ig
1e2bl3os.
1e2bla.
1e2ble.
1e2bli.
1e2blo.
1e2blu.
1e2c1aj.
1e2c1ajn.
1e2c1oj.
1e2c1ojn.
1e2c1on.
1e2c3an.
1e2ca.
1e2ce.
1e2co.
1e2d2z
1e2g1aj.
1e2g1ajn.
1e2g1as.
1e2g1is.
1e2g1oj.
1e2g1ojn.
1e2g1on.
1e2g1us.
1e2g3an.
1e2g3os.
1e2ga.
1e2gal
1e2ge.
1e2gi.
1e2go.
1e2gu.
1e2j1aj.
1e2j1ajn.
1e2j1ig
1e2j1iĝ
1e2j1oj.
1e2j1ojn.
1e2j1on.
1e2j3an.
1e2ja.
1e2je.
1e2jo.
1e2kzem
1e2le1g2an3t
1e2lemen2t1
1e2m1aj.
1e2m1ajn.
1e2m1as.
1e2m1ec
1e2m1is.
1e2m1oj.
1e2m1ojn.
1e2m1on.
1e2m1u2l
1e2m1us.
1e2m3an.
1e2m3os.
1e2ma.
1e2me.
1e2mi.
1e2mo.
1e2mu.
1e2s1tr
1e2sprim
1e2str1i2n1aj.
1e2str1i2n1ajn.
1e2str1i2n1oj.
1e2str1i2n1ojn.
1e2str1i2n1on.
1e2str1i2n3an.
1e2str1i2na.
1e2str1i2ne.
1e2str1i2no.
1e2t1aj.
1e2t1ajn.
1e2t1as.
1e2t1is.
1e2t1oj.
1e2t1ojn.
1e2t1on.
1e2t1us.
1e2t3an.
1e2t3os.
1e2ta.
1e2te.
1e2ti.
1e2to.
1e2tu.
1ek2s3c4i3t
1i2d1aj.
1i2d1ajn.
1i2d1ar1aj.
1i2d1ar1ajn.
1i2d1ar1oj.
1i2d1ar1ojn.
1i2d1ar1on.
1i2d1ar3an.
1i2d1ara.
1i2d1are.
1i2d1aro.
1i2d1i2n1aj.
1i2d1i2n1ajn.
1i2d1i2n1oj.
1i2d1i2n1ojn.
1i2d1i2n1on.
1i2d1i2n3an.
1i2d1i2na.
1i2d1i2ne.
1i2d1i2no.
1i2d1oj.
1i2d1ojn.
1i2d1on.
1i2d3an.
1i2da.
1i2de.
1i2do.
1i2g1a2d
1i2g1aj.
1i2g1ajn.
1i2g1as.
1i2g1e2m
1i2g1i2l
1i2g1is.
1i2g1oj.
1i2g1ojn.
1i2g1on.
1i2g1us.
1i2g3an.
1i2g3os.
1i2ga.
1i2gant
1i2gat
1i2ge.
1i2gebl
1i2gi.
1i2gint
1i2git
1i2go.
1i2gont
1i2gu.
1i2ĝ1a2d
1i2ĝ1aj.
1i2ĝ1ajn.
1i2ĝ1as.
1i2ĝ1e2m
1i2ĝ1is.
1i2ĝ1oj.
1i2ĝ1ojn.
1i2ĝ1on.
1i2ĝ1us.
1i2ĝ3an.
1i2ĝ3e4m
1i2ĝ3os.
1i2ĝa.
1i2ĝant
1i2ĝe.
1i2ĝi.
1i2ĝint
1i2ĝo.
1i2ĝont
1i2ĝu.
1i2l1aj.
1i2l1ajn.
1i2l1ar
1i2l1oj.
1i2l1ojn.
1i2l1on.
1i2l3an.
1i2la.
1i2le.
1i2lo.
1i2s2m3ec
1i2s2t1aj.
1i2s2t1ajn.
1i2s2t1i2n1aj.
1i2s2t1i2n1ajn.
1i2s2t1i2n1oj.
1i2s2t1i2n1ojn.
1i2s2t1i2n1on.
1i2s2t1i2n3an.
1i2s2t1i2na.
1i2s2t1i2ne.
1i2s2t1i2no.
1i2s2t1oj.
1i2s2t1ojn.
1i2s2t1on.
1i2s2t3a4r
1i2s2t3an.
1i2s2t3ec
1i2s2ta.
1i2s2te.
1i2s2to.
1i2t1aj.
1i2t1ajn.
1i2t1oj.
1i2t1ojn.
1i2t1on.
1i2t3an.
1i2t3ec
1i2ta.
1i2te.
1i2to.
1in1t1aj.
1in1t1ajn.
1in1t1oj.
1in1t1ojn.
1in1t1on.
1in1t3an.
1in1ta.
1in1te.
1in1to.
1in2d1aj.
1in2d1ajn.
1in2d1as.
1in2d1is.
1in2d1us.
1in2d3an.
1in2d3ec
1in2d3ig
1in2d3iĝ
1in2d3os.
1in2da.
1in2de.
1in2di.
1in2do.
1in2don.
1in2du.
1in2t3ar
1in2t3ec
1in2t3us
1inte2r1
1is.
1is2m1aj.
1is2m1ajn.
1is2m1oj.
1is2m1ojn.
1is2m1on.
1is2m3an.
1is2ma.
1is2me.
1is2mo.
1o2bl1aj.
1o2bl1ajn.
1o2bl1ec
1o2bl1oj.
1o2bl1ojn.
1o2bl1on.
1o2bl3an.
1o2bla.
1o2ble.
1o2blo.
1o2dor
1o2kup
1o2por1tun
1o2rel
1o2s3c2i3l
1oj.
1ojn.
1on.
1on2t1aj.
1on2t1ajn.
1on2t1oj.
1on2t1ojn.
1on2t1on.
1on2t3an.
1on2ta.
1on2te.
1on2to.
1os.
1s2c2h
1s2trek
1ŝ2tejn
1u2j1aj.
1u2j1ajn.
1u2j1ig
1u2j1iĝ
1u2j1oj.
1u2j1ojn.
1u2j1on.
1u2j3an.
1u2ja.
1u2je.
1u2jo.
1u2l1aj.
1u2l1ajn.
1u2l1ar
1u2l1i2n1aj.
1u2l1i2n1ajn.
1u2l1i2n1oj.
1u2l1i2n1ojn.
1u2l1i2n1on.
1u2l1i2n3an.
1u2l1i2na.
1u2l1i2ne.
1u2l1i2no.
1u2l1oj.
1u2l1ojn.
1u2l1on.
1u2l3an.
1u2l3ec
1u2l3ej
1u2la.
1u2le.
1u2lo.
1u2m1aj.
1u2m1ajn.
1u2m1as.
1u2m1is.
1u2m1oj.
1u2m1ojn.
1u2m1on.
1u2m1us.
1u2m3an.
1u2m3ec
1u2m3os.
1u2ma.
1u2me.
1u2mi.
1u2mo.
1u2mu.
1u2nuo
1us.
2a3a2
2ao2
2b1ŝ2
2c1s2
2ĉ1g2
2ĉ1ĝ2
2ĉ1ŝ2
2e3o
2eu2
2f1j2
2f1ĵ
2f1t
2f3k
2fik
2g1d2
2g1m
2ĝ1b2
2ĥ1s2
2i4larb
2ipov
2j1s2
2jis.
2jn.
2k1n
2k3e2rar
2l3ĥ2
2linter
2lp.
2lt.
2m3f2
2n1j
2n1m
2nk.
2ns.
2nt.
2oplen
2ou
2p1f2
2p1j2
2p1k2
2p1m2
2p1p2
2p1s2
2p1ŝ2
2p1t
2r1ĉ
2r1g
2r1ĝ
2r1ĵ
2r1ŝ2
2r1v
2r1z
2s1g2
2s1l
2s1m
2s1r2
2s3e2rar
2spre
2st.
2stf
2ŝ1c2
2ŝ1ĉ2
2ŝ1d2
2ŝ1g2
2t1l2
2u3l2ard
2u3l2ari
2v1j2
2v1r2
3a2c2i2d
3a2mas
3a2par2a3t
3a4ranĝ
3afe23
3aj.
3ajn.
3an.
3e2senc
3fiks
3k2nab
3k2ned
3n2j1aj.
3n2j1ajn.
3n2j1oj.
3n2j1ojn.
3n2j1on.
3n2j3an.
3n2ja.
3n2je.
3n2jo.
3o4lea
3o4lei
3o4leo
3s2lab
3s2lalom
3s2lang
3s2lav
3s2lip
3s2lovak
3s2loven
3s2lup
3s2merald
3s2tr2a2t
3s2tu1d
4b1b2
4b1c
4b1ĉ
4b1d
4b1f
4b1g
4b1ĝ
4b1h4
4b1j2
4b1ĵ
4b1k
4b1m
4b1n
4b1p
4b1s
4b1s2k
4b1t
4b1v
4b1z
4c1b
4c1c2
4c1ĉ
4c1d
4c1f
4c1g
4c1ĝ
4c1h4
4c1j2
4c1ĵ
4c1k
4c1l
4c1m
4c1n
4c1p2
4c1r
4c1ŝ
4c1t
4c1v
4c1z
4ĉ1b
4ĉ1c
4ĉ1ĉ
4ĉ1d
4ĉ1f
4ĉ1h4
4ĉ1ĵ
4ĉ1k
4ĉ1l2
4ĉ1m
4ĉ1n
4ĉ1p
4ĉ1s
4ĉ1t
4ĉ1v
4ĉ1z
4d1b
4d1c
4d1ĉ
4d1d2
4d1f
4d1g
4d1ĝ
4d1h4
4d1j2
4d1ĵ
4d1k
4d1l4
4d1m
4d1n2
4d1p
4d1ŝ2
4d1t
4d1v
4d3s2
4f1b
4f1c
4f1ĉ
4f1d
4f1f2
4f1g
4f1ĝ
4f1h4
4f1m
4f1n
4f1p
4f1s4
4f1ŝ4
4f1v
4f1z
4g1b
4g1c
4g1ĉ
4g1f
4g1g2
4g1ĝ
4g1h4
4g1j2
4g1ĵ
4g1k
4g1n
4g1p
4g1s
4g1ŝ
4g1t
4g1z
4ĝ1c
4ĝ1ĉ
4ĝ1d
4ĝ1f
4ĝ1g
4ĝ1ĝ
4ĝ1h4
4ĝ1j2
4ĝ1ĵ
4ĝ1k
4ĝ1l
4ĝ1m
4ĝ1n
4ĝ1p
4ĝ1s
4ĝ1ŝ
4ĝ1t
4ĝ1v
4ĝ1z
4h1ĉ
4h1ĝ
4h1ĵ
4h1ŝ
4ĥ1b
4ĥ1c
4ĥ1ĉ
4ĥ1d
4ĥ1f
4ĥ1g
4ĥ1ĝ
4ĥ1h4
4ĥ1j2
4ĥ1ĵ
4ĥ1k
4ĥ1m
4ĥ1n
4ĥ1p
4ĥ1ŝ
4ĥ1t
4ĥ1v
4ĥ1z
4j1b
4j1c
4j1ĉ
4j1d
4j1f
4j1g
4j1ĝ
4j1h4
4j1ĵ
4j1k
4j1l
4j1m
4j1n
4j1p
4j1r
4j1ŝ
4j1t
4j1v
4j1z
4j2s3t
4ĵ1b
4ĵ1c
4ĵ1ĉ
4ĵ1d
4ĵ1f
4ĵ1g
4ĵ1ĝ
4ĵ1h4
4ĵ1j2
4ĵ1ĵ
4ĵ1k
4ĵ1l
4ĵ1m
4ĵ1n
4ĵ1p
4ĵ1s
4ĵ1ŝ
4ĵ1t
4ĵ1v
4ĵ1z
4k1b2
4k1c
4k1ĉ
4k1d
4k1f
4k1g
4k1ĝ
4k1h4
4k1j2
4k1ĵ
4k1m
4k1p
4k1s
4k1ŝ2
4k1t
4k1z
4k3k2
4l1b
4l1c
4l1ĉ
4l1d
4l1f
4l1g
4l1ĝ
4l1h4
4l1j2
4l1ĵ
4l1k
4l1l2
4l1m
4l1n
4l1r4
4l1s2
4l1t
4l1v
4l1z
4l3p
4l5ŝ2
4m1b
4m1c
4m1ĉ
4m1d
4m1g
4m1ĝ
4m1h4
4m1j2
4m1ĵ
4m1l
4m1n
4m1p
4m1r
4m1s2
4m1ŝ
4m1t
4m1v
4m1z
4m3e2rar
4m3k
4m3m2
4n1b
4n1c
4n1ĉ
4n1d
4n1f
4n1g
4n1ĝ
4n1h4
4n1ĵ
4n1k
4n1l2
4n1n
4n1p2
4n1r
4n1s2
4n1ŝ2
4n1t
4n1v2
4n1z
4ne.
4oĉambr
4ografi
4ologi
4p1b2
4p1c2
4p1ĉ2
4p1d2
4p1g2
4p1ĝ2
4p1h4
4p1ĵ2
4p1v2
4p1z2
4r1b
4r1c
4r1d
4r1f
4r1h4
4r1j2
4r1k
4r1l2
4r1m
4r1n
4r1p
4r1r4
4r1s2
4r1t
4s1ĉ
4s1d
4s1ĝ
4s1h4
4s1j2
4s1ĵ
4s1n
4s3b2
4s3s2
4s3ŝ2
4st1n
4ŝ1b
4ŝ1f
4ŝ1ĝ
4ŝ1h4
4ŝ1ĵ
4ŝ1k
4ŝ1s
4ŝ1ŝ2
4ŝ1z
4t1b
4t1c
4t1ĉ
4t1d
4t1f
4t1g
4t1ĝ
4t1h4
4t1j2
4t1ĵ
4t1k
4t1m
4t1n
4t1p2
4t1ŝ2
4t1t
4t1v
4t1z
4t3s2
4ŭ1
4v1c2
4v1ĉ
4v1d
4v1f
4v1g
4v1ĝ
4v1h4
4v1ĵ
4v1k2
4v1l
4v1m
4v1n
4v1p
4v1s
4v1ŝ
4v1t
4v1v
4v1z
4v3b2
4z1b
4z1c
4z1ĉ
4z1d
4z1f4
4z1g
4z1ĝ
4z1h4
4z1j2
4z1ĵ
4z1k
4z1l
4z1m
4z1n
4z1p
4z1r
4z1s
4z1ŝ
4z1t
4z1v
5m2anier
5s2nuf
5s4led
5s4mirg
a1
a2b1r
a2bu3t2i3l
a2cet2i3l
a2ĉ2e3t
a2dek2v2a3t
a2g1reg2a3t
a2k1rob2a3t
a2kur2a3t
a2lie
a2liĝ
a2nali
a2rom2a3t
a2spekt
.ab2a3t
.ab2is3m
.abs2i3d
.abs2in3t
adam2a4n3t2i3n
adiab2a3t
adjut2an3t
advok2a3t
ae2
afrik2a3t
.ag2a3t
.ag2i3t
.aj2n1
.aj3n2u
ak1red2i3t
.akr2i3d
.akum2u3l
al2i3g2a3tor
.al2t
al3t2a3r
al3tabl
al3ter
al3trui
.alb2u3m
alfab2e3t
alop2a3t
alum2e3t
am2a3r
.amet2i3s3t
amul2e3t
.an2a3k
.and2u3j
.ang2i3l
ang2u3l
antikr2i3s3t
antrac2i3t
aor2i3s3t
.apet2i3t
.apr2e3c
.apr2i3l
.aps2i3d
.apu2d1
.ar2i3d
.ar2i3s3t
ar3bitr
.arg2i3l
.arog2an3t
asimil3i4t
.ask2e3t
.askar2i3d
.asp2i3d
.at1l2an3t
.at1l2e3t
aŭtorit2a3t
.av2i3d
.avok2a3d
.az2i3l
b1l
b1s2t
b2ar3b
b2i3l2a3rd
b2i3t
b2lek
b2lok
b2lov
b2lu
.ba3t
.bab2i3l
.bac2i3l
bajon2e3t
.bal2a3d
.bal2i3s3t
.band2i3t
barb2a3r3
.bat2i3s3t
batal3an4t
baz2a3r3
.baz2i3l
.be2l
be2l1a2nim
.be2l1a2r2t
be2l1a2sp
.be3j
.be3t
bel3e4g
.ber2i3l
.bet2u3l
.bi2o
.bi3l
.bi4t1
bi4t1o2k
bi5t2u3m
bil2e3t
.bin3d
biskv2i3t
biz2a3r
.bl2a3t
.bl4in3d
blasf2e3m
.bo2n1
.bo3n2ev
.boh2e3m
.bol2e3t
.bol2i3d
.bon2e
.bon3e2du
.bon3ec
.bon3eg
.br2i3d
.br2i3g
br2i3g2a3d
.br2i3ĝ
br2i3l
.br2i3t
.br4
bracel2e3t
.braz2i3l
brev2e3t
brig2a4n3t2i3n
.brok2a3t
.brul3
.bu2ŝ
.bu3l
.bu3m
.buĝ2e3t
bulg2a3r
bur2g
c2i3d
.ced2i3l
.cen2t
cen2t3o2n
cen2t3o2p
cen3t2r
.cez2a3r
.ci3d2a3r
.ci3r2i3l
.ci3s3t
.ci3t
cig2a3r
ciga4r1in2g
cik2a3d
.cirkv2i3t
.civ2i3l
.civ2i3t
.ĉa2s
.ĉe2f1
ĉi2e2l1
.ĉi4a3
.ĉi4e
.ĉi4o
.ĉi4u3
.ĉia4m1
.ĉie4s1
ĉinĉ2i3l
.ĉio4m
ĉio5manĝ
ĉj2
ĉokol2a3d
d1z
.dakt2i3l
.dav2i3d
de2k1o2k
de2k1u2n
de2k3o2na
de2k3o2ne.
de2k3o2no
de2k3o2p
.de2v
.de3c
de3ve2n
de3vo2j
.deb2a3t
.deb2e3t
.deb2i3l
.def2i3l
defic2i3t
delik2a3t
.dem2e3t
.di2s3
.di3g
.di3g2i3t
di3rekt
.di3s4ert
.di3s4erv
.di3s4ip
.di3s4oci
diab2e3t
diad2e3m
.dil2e3m
dilet2an3t
din2a3r
dinam2i3t
diplom2a3t
disk1r2et
disk2on3t
.dist2i3l
div2i3d
diver2s3
diver3s4aspec
dol2a3r
.domic2i3l
dor2m3
dr2a3t
.dr2i3l
.du2m1i2r
.du2on1
.duk2a3t
e1
e2cig
e2sper
e2st
e3e4
e3m2u3ls
ea2
.ed2e3m
.ed2i3l
.ef1r2i3t
.eg2i3d
ejak2u3l
.ek1
.ek1i2r
.ek1l2um
.ek1l4a2m
.ek1r
.ek2ip
.ek2olog
.ek2onom
.ek2s1
ek3s2alt
.ek3s2ci
.ek3s2ekv
.ek3s2ent
.ek3s2id
ek3s2ku
.ek3s2on
.ek3s2tar
ek4s3ciz
ek4s3kur
ek4s3kuz
.eka2m
.ekf4
.ekma2l1
eksplic2i3t
.ekste2r1
.ekz2e3m
.ekz2i3l
ekz2i3s3t
.el1aĉet
.el1i2r
.el1uz
.el2i3t
.el3v2
elef2an3t
elizab2e3t
embl2e3m
.emer2i3t
emfiz2e3m
.en1e2st
.en1i2r
.enk2e3t
epit2e3t
er2a3r3
.erm2i3t
.erud2i3t
.et2a3t
.et2i3l
eŭkl2i3d
.ev2i3t
f2a3r
f2ar3b
f2i3l2a3ri
fac2i3l3
fakult2a3t
.fal2s3
fal3s4e3t
.fal3s4id
fal3s4tel
fas2a3d
.fe3b1l
fen2e3st3r
fer2m3
.fi2ŝ1
.fi2t2z1
.fi3g
.fi3l
.fi4garb
.fik2s1
fik2s1i2de
.fist2u3l
.fl4
.flor2i3d
fo2j
.fo2r1
.fo3r2in3t
.fo3r2u3m
fon2e3m
.fon3t
form2a3t
.form2e3t
form2u3l
formul2a3r
fr2a3t
.fr2i3d
.fr2i3t
.fr2on3t
.fra2z1
fra3z2eo
.fre2ŝ
frit2i3l2a3ri
.fu2ŝ3
.fu3l
.fu3m
.fus2i3l
g1v
gal2a4n3t2i3n
.gal2an3t
galin2u3l
garg2a3r
.gaz2e3t
.gen2i3s3t
.gi3s3t
.gig2an3t
git2a3r3
.gl2i3t
.gl4
.gla3t
.gor2i3l
gr2a3d
.gr2i3l
.gr4
gra2n2d1
graf2e3m
.graf2i3t
.gran2a3t
.gran2i3t
.gran2u3l
gran3d2io
.grat2u3l
.grav2i3t
.gru3m
.gu3m
ĝ2e3m
.ĝent2i3l
.ĝi2s1
.ĝi4a3
.halel2u3j
.haml2et
har2a3kir
.har2e3m
.hel4p1
.hep2a3t
.herk2u3l
.herm2e3t
hermafrod2i3t
hez2i3t
hi3rund
.hi3s3t
hiac2in3t
hibr2i3d
hierod2u3l
.hin3d
hipokr2i3t
homunk2u3l
.hon3t
horiz2on3t
.hu3m
hum2i3d
hung2a3r
ĥlam2i3d
i1
i2r
i3rurg
i4u3o
ias2
ilu3zi
im2i3t
in2gig
in2giĝ
.in3d4i2g
in3d4iĝen
.inc2i3t
inf2a4n3t
infin2i3t
inkogn2i3t
.ins2i3d
ins2i3s3t
ins2u3l
ins2ul2i3n
inst2an3t
.inst2i3g
.instanb2u3l
inte3r2es
inte3r2ez
inte3r2upt
inter3v2ju
interm2i3t
.intr2i3g
inv2a3d
.inv2i3t
invent2a3r
.io2m1
is1la2m3
iud2
izob2a3r
j2ar
j2u2n
.jac2in3t
jerusal2e3m
.ju3l
.jub2i3l
jug2u3l2a3r
ĵ2e3t
.ĵak2e3t
.ĵu3l
k1v
.k2a4n3t2i3n
k2an3t
k2ar3b
k2n2ar3
k2s1t2r
k2v2a4r1
k2v2an3t
.ka2ŝ1
.kab2u3l
kabin2e3t
.kad2e3t
kalend2a3r3
kalend2u3l
kalk2u2l1
.kalo3c2say
kamar2a3d
.kamar2i3l
.kan2a3d
kan3t2ar2i3d
kande2l1in2g
kandid2a3t
kap2i3l2a3r3
kapac2i3t
kapit2u3l
kaps2u3l
.kar2a3t
kastanj2e3t
.kazem2a3t
.kel2k
.ki3l
.ki3r2i3l
.ki3s3t
.ki4a3
.ki4o
.ki4u3
kia4l
kie2s
.kin2e3t
kl2a3r
.kl4
kla2v3a4r
klarn2e3t
.klim2a3t
kloz2e3t
klu3z
ko2ŝ1m2ar
ko2t1l2e3t
koag2u3l
.kom2a3t
.kom2e3t
komis2a3r
.komit2a3t
komp2a3r
komp2a3t
.komp2i3l
kompl2e3t
komprom2i3t
komput3i4l
komuni2k1
.kon3t
.konf2e3t
.konf2i3d
.konf2i3t
konfr2on3t
konkord2a3t
konkr2e3t
kons2i3l
kons2i3s3t
.kons2u3l
kons2u3m
konson2an3t
konst2an3t
.kop2u3l
korpusk2u3l
kors2e3t
korv2e3t
.kost2u3m
.kr2i3s3t
.kr4
.krav2a3t
.kred2i3t
.krik2e3t
krizal2i3d
.kro2m1
kro3m2a3t
kro3m2ia
kro3m2io
.krok2e3t
krokod2i3l
krom2o
kru3z
.ku2n1
.ku3l
ku3n2ikl
ku3z
.kuk2u3m
kulin2a3r
.kum2u3l
kv2a3kr
.kv2i3t
.kv4
kvadr2an3t
.kvadr2i3g
.kval2i3t
kvar3o2p
kvatern2a3r
kvi2n1
.kvi3r2i3t
kvin3o2p
.kviv2i3t
kvodlib2e3t
.kvor2u3m
l2e3g
l2ig
l4s3l
labi3r2in3t
lap2i3d2a3r
laŭ2d2a3t
laŭ2dind
laŭ2t1le4g
le2ĝ
.le3m
leŭten2an3t
.li3s3t
.li3t
.li4a3
li5an
li5as
.lib2i3d
likv2i3d
limon2a3d
lin2g2v1uz
.lin3d
.liv2i3d
.liverp2u3l
lo2n2g1
lon3g2itud
.lu3l
.lu3m
.luk2u3m
m2et
m2i3l
m4f3k
.ma2l1
ma2lb2o2n1
.ma3l2ic
.madr2i3d
.magn2a3t
magn2e3t
majorit2a3t
mak2u3l
mala2m
malak2i3t
malgl2a3t
malk4
malno2v1
malpl2e2j1
mals4am1
.malsupre2n1
.mand2a3t
manip2u3l
.mant2i3l
.margar2i3t
marion2e3t
.marm2i3t
mastod2on3t
matrik2u3l
mb2l2
.me2m1
.me2z1
.me3b1l
me3m2or
.me3m2uar
me3z2embri
me3z2enter
.me3z2ere
me3z2u2r
.mecen2a3t
.med2i3t
megal2i3t
meĥ2a3n2is3m
mek2a3n2is3m
.melol2on3t
.mem3a2
